incubator/apertium-en-la.la.dix
    <!-- Second Declension -->
    <pardef n="mur/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Iuli/us__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dom/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="puer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="murus"><i>mur</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abortivus"><i>abortiv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="acervus"><i>acerv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversarius"><i>adversari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alumnus"><i>alumn</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ambitus"><i>ambit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amicus"><i>amic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="angelus"><i>angel</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="animus"><i>anim</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apostolus"><i>apostol</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="appetitus"><i>appetit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="architectus"><i>architect</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="articulus"><i>articul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atavus"><i>atav</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="autus"><i>aut</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="baculus"><i>bacul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="balanus"><i>balan</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="calculus"><i>calcul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="campus"><i>camp</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="canticus"><i>cantic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="capitulus"><i>capitul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cattus"><i>catt</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="christianus"><i>christian</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cibus"><i>cib</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="daemonus"><i>daemon</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="diabolus"><i>diabol</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="discipulus"><i>discipul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="episcopus"><i>episcop</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="estus"><i>est</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="filius"><i>fili</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gladius"><i>gladi</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hortus"><i>hort</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="hymnus"><i>hymn</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="lacus"><i>lac</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="legatus"><i>legat</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="locus"><i>loc</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="medicus"><i>medic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="modus"><i>mod</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="morbus"><i>morb</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="musculus"><i>muscul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nuntius"><i>nunti</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="oppidanus"><i>oppidan</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="populus"><i>popul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ramus"><i>ram</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sagittarius"><i>sagittari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="servulus"><i>servul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="socius"><i>soci</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sponsus"><i>spons</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="thesaurus"><i>thesaur</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tumultus"><i>tumult</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="typhus"><i>typh</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="umerus"><i>umer</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="velius"><i>veli</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ventulus"><i>ventul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vermiculus"><i>vermicul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="viduatus"><i>viduat</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vulgus"><i>vulg</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vulticulus"><i>vulticul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domus"><i>vult</i><par n="dom/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Iulius"><i>Iuli</i><par n="Iuli/us__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brutus"><i>Brutus</i><par n="Iuli/us__np"/></e>
    <e lm="puer"><i>puer</i><par n="puer__n"/></e>
